Washington statutes.
RCW 26.52.050

Peace officer immunity.

A peace officer or a peace officer's legal advisor may not be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest under this chapter if the peace officer or the peace officer's legal advisor acted in good faith and without malice.

[ 1999 c 184 s 7.]